Hawaii statutes.
§463-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Board" means the board of private
detectives and guards described in section 463-2.

"Detective", "private
detective", or "investigator" means a licensed person qualified
to obtain information and evidence not readily or publicly accessible.

"Detective agency" or "private
detective agency" means a licensed firm engaged in the private detective
business.

"Firm" means a sole proprietor,
corporation, joint venture, limited liability partnership, limited liability
corporation, partnership, association, or any other legal business entity.

"Guard" [Repeal and reenactment on
July 1, 2016. L 2010, c 208, §8.] means a registered uniformed or
nonuniformed person responsible for the safekeeping of a client's properties
and persons within contractually prescribed boundaries, and for observation and
reporting relative to such safekeeping. "Guard" shall not include
any active duty federal, state, or county law enforcement officers or
personnel.

"Guard agency" means a licensed firm
engaged in the guard business.

"Principal detective" means a
licensed detective designated as the detective agency's primary licensee who is
fully responsible for the direct management and control of the agency and the
agency's employees.

"Principal guard" means a licensed
guard designated as the guard agency's primary licensee who is fully
responsible for the direct management and control of the agency and the
agency's employees. [L 1961, c 77, pt of §1; Supp, §165A-1; HRS §463-1; am L
1983, c 40, §1; am L 1994, c 122, §1; am L 2004, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 208, §2]

Note

Definition of "guard": Repeal and reenactment on
July 1, 2016, by L 2010, c 208, §8 deleted by L 2014, c 94, §3.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next